Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5846
Certificate of need; decision; department; duties.

The department shall make a decision in writing to (1) approve the application and issue a certificate of need, (2) disapprove the application and deny a certificate of need, or (3) if the application is for more long-term care beds than allowed under section 71-5829.04, approve the application but issue a certificate of need only for the reduced number of beds that section 71-5829.04 allows. The department shall make its decision within sixty days after the date the application was received.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 46;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 37;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 65;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 29.